District of Columbia statutes.
6-301.09

Repealed

Use-value appraisals.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 797, ch. 736, § 10
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1103, Pub. L. 85-854, § 1(12)
Aug. 17, 1982, D.C. Law 4-140, § 2(c), 29 DCR 2862
Sept. 17, 1982, D.C. Law 4-150, § 402, 29 DCR 3377
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(e), 50 DCR 5668
1981 Ed., § 5-809.
1973 Ed., § 5-709.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Mayor authorized to issue regulations: Section 401 of D.C. Law 4-150 provided that the Mayor shall issue regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of the act.